src/morphology/roots/pronouns.lexc
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:useista  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:useina   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:useiden  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:useihin  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:useisiin     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:useissa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:usein    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:useat    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:useita   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:useiksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:useatta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:usealta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:usealla  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:usealle  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:useasta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:useana   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:usean    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:useaan   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:useassa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:usean    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:usea     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:useaa    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usea][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:useaksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=useasti][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:useasti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:usein  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][CASE=CMT]:useine   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:useimmitta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:useimmilta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:useimmilla  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:useimmille  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:useimmista  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:useimpiin PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:useimmissa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:useimmin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:useimmat    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:useimpina PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:useimmiksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:useimmitta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:useimmilta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:useimmilla  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:useimmille  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:useimmasta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:useimpaan   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:useimmassa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:useimman    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:usein     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:useimpaa    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=usein][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:useimmaksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=vastaava][POS=PROADJECTIVE]:vastaav  A_AALTOILEVA ; 
[WORD_ID=yhtäällä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:yhtäällä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:yksittäkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:yksiltäkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:yksilläkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:yksillekään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:yksinekään    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:yksistäkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:yksinäkään    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:yksienkään    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:yksiinkään    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:yksissäkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:yksinkään     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:yhdetkään     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:yksiäkään     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:yksiksikään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:yhdettäkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:yhdeltäkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:yhdelläkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:yhdellekään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:yhdestäkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:yhtenäkään    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:yhdenkään     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:yhteenkään    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:yhdessäkään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:yhdenkään     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:yksikään      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:yhtäkään      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksikään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:yhdeksikään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:yksittä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:yksiltä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:yksillä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:yksille     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:yksine      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:yksistä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:yksinä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:yksien      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:yksiin      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:yksissä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:yksin   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:yhdet   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:yksiä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:yksiksi     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:yhdettä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:yhdeltä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:yhdellä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:yhdelle     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:yhdestä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:yhtenä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:yhden   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:yhteen      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:yhdessä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:yhden   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:yksi    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:yhtä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yksi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:yhdeksi     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:yhet     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:yhettä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:yheltä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:yhellä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:yhelle   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:yhestä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:yhtenä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:yhen     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:yhteen   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:yhessä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:yhen     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:yks      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:yhtä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=yks][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:yheksi   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
